Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB817.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XVII-A.2PREVAILING WAGE AND APPRENTICESHIP REQUIREMENTSSection 1701-A.2. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:12345678910111213141516171819202122 "Apprenticeship program." An apprenticeship training program that is approved by and registered with the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of July 14, 1961 (P.L.604, No.304), known as The Apprenticeship and Training Act, and that provides for on-the-job training, classroom training and the graduation of apprentice trainees to journeyperson status. The term includes an apprenticeship program subject to ERISA or a non-ERISA program."Business entity." An association, partnership, corporation, sole proprietorship, limit ed liability company or employer. "Capital investment." Work conducted under a contract in volving the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility on the parcel through which a business seeks a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit through a tax incentive."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. "ERISA Program." A program under 29 U.S.C. Ch. 18 (relating to Employee Retirement Income Security Program)."Skilled craft laborer." A member of a trade who meets any of the following criteria:(1) The individual is a worker who has work experience equivalent to the total number of on-the-job training hours required by the applicable apprenticeship program.(2) The individual g raduated from, or is currently enrolled in, an apprenticeship program."Tax incentive." A tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit under any of the following:(1) Article XIX-C.(2) Article XIX-D.(3) Article XIX-H.20250SB0817PN0886 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) The act of October 6, 1998 (P.L.705, No.92), known as the Keystone Opportunity Zone, Keystone Opportunity Expansion Zone and Keystone Opportunity Improvement Zone Act.Section 1702-A.2. Prevailing wage requirements for business entities making capital investments.A business entity that makes a capital investment of more than $25,000 for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility on the parcel through which the business entity seeks a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit through a tax incentive shall verify with the department, in the following calendar or fiscal year, all of the following:(1) Seventy percent of the individuals employed by the business entity in construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of the facility are skilled craft laborers.(2) I ndividuals employed by the business entity or a contractor or subcontractor of the business entity for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of the facility have been paid the prevailing minimum wage rate for each craft or classification as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act.Section 1703-A.2. Enforcement.The Department of Labor and Industry shall enforce this article. The act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, 34 Pa. Code Ch. 9 Subch. E (relating to prevailing regulations) and 34 Pa. Code §§ 211.1 (relating to applicability of general rules) and 213.1 (relating 20250SB0817PN0886 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to applicability of general rules) shall apply to any construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility, other than maintenance work, that occurs due to a business entity making a capital investment of more than $25,000 for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of that facility on the parcel through which the business entity seeks a tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit through a tax incentive.Section 1704-A.2. Violations.(a) Refund requirement.--In addition to enforcement authorized under the act of August 15, 1961 (P.L.987, No.442), known as the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act, and section 1703-A.2, if, after notice and hearing, the Department of Labor and Industry determines that a business entity intentionally failed to pay or intentionally caused another person to fail to pay the prevailing wage or benefit rates as specified under section 11(h) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act for the construction, reconstruction, demolition, alteration or repair of a facility in violation of this article, or ratified the intentional failure by a contractor or subcontractor of the business entity, the business entity shall refund 100% of the amount of the tax exemption, deduction, abatement or credit awarded through a tax incentive for the fiscal year in which the intentional noncompliance occurred as determined by the Department of Labor and Industry.(b) Appeals.--A finding of a violation under subsection (a) may be appealed under section 2.2(e)(1) of the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act and 34 Pa. Code § 213.3 (relating to appeals from determinations of the Secretary). Any final determination by the Appeals Board under the Pennsylvania Prevailing Wage Act 20250SB0817PN0886 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 may be appealed in accordance with 2 Pa.C.S. (relating to administrative law and procedure).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0817PN0886 - 5 - 123